District of Columbia statutes.
42-2503

Eligibility.

(a)

An applicant shall be eligible for the Program if the applicant is:

(1)

A District of Columbia government employee, an employee of a District of Columbia public charter school, or a person who has accepted an offer to be a District of Columbia police officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, public school teacher, or a teacher at a District of Columbia public charter school; and

(2)

A first-time homebuyer in the District.

(b)

No more than one member of a household shall be eligible for the Program.

(c)

The Mayor shall not limit the eligibility of an applicant to participate in the Program based on the length of employment of the applicant or the length of time that the applicant has resided in the District of Columbia if the applicant is a District of Columbia police officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, public school teacher, or a teacher at a District of Columbia public charter school; provided, that the Mayor may limit the eligibility of an applicant to receive a District of Columbia contribution toward a down payment based on the length of employment of the applicant with the District of Columbia or a District of Columbia public charter school or the length of time the applicant has resided in the District of Columbia. The Mayor shall not limit the eligibility of an applicant to participate in the Program based on the place of residence of the applicant at the time of his or her application. A rule, or a portion of a rule, inconsistent with this subsection shall be void.

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-96, § 4, 47 DCR 1081
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-236, § 2, 48 DCR 595
Apr. 24, 2004, D.C. Law 15-152, § 2, 50 DCR 9827
Section 3 of D.C. Law 13-236 provided: “The Mayor shall, pursuant to the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 issue rules within 90 days of the effective date of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Program Teacher, Police Officer, and Firefighter Hiring Incentive Amendment Act of 2000 (’Act’) to implement the Act.”
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 4 of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-258, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1124).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 4 of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-188, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10407).
D.C. Law 15-152, in subsecs. (a)(1) and (c), inserted “emergency medical technician,” after “firefighter,”.
“(1) A District government employee; and”
D.C. Law 13-236 rewrote subsec. (a)(1) and added subsec. (c). Prior to amendment, subsec. (a)(1) read:
This section is referenced in § 42-2501.